src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON JASME_LOAN
             +N+Err/Orth:^asm  X_NIEJTE ;
             +N+Err/Orth:^aasm X_NIEJTE ;
                      +N:jaasm X_NIEJTE ;
             +N+Err/Orth:jasm  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:^asm  R      ;

LEXICON ISTE_LOAN
                     NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG: R      ;

LEXICON ALJE_LOAN
                   +N:alj X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:lj  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:lj  R      ;

LEXICON EKSTE_LOAN
                   +N:ekst X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:kst  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:kst  R      ;

LEXICON ALME_LOAN
                   +N:alm X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:lm  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:lm  R      ;


LEXICON ASTE_LOAN
                   +N:ast X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:st  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:st  R      ;


LEXICON AKSE_LOAN
                   +N:aks X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:ks  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ks  R      ;


LEXICON ARDE_LOAN
                   +N:ard X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rd  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rd  R      ;


LEXICON ENGE_LOAN
                   +N:eng X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:ng  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ng  R      ;


LEXICON ERSE_LOAN
                   +N:ers  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rs  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rs  R      ;


LEXICON ASME_LOAN
                   +N:asm X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:sm  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:sm  R      ;


LEXICON ASKE_LOAN
                   +N:ask X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:sk  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:sk  R      ;


LEXICON ANSE_LOAN
                   +N:ans X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:ns  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ns  R      ;

LEXICON ANTE_LOAN
                   +N:ant X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:nt  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:nt  R      ;

LEXICON ENTE_LOAN
                   +N:ent X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:nt  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:nt  R      ;

LEXICON ENDE_LOAN
                   +N:end  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:nd  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:nd  R      ;


LEXICON ERME_LOAN
                   +N:erm X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rm  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rm  R      ;

LEXICON ERBE_LOAN
                   +N:erb X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rb  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rb  R      ;

LEXICON ERNE_LOAN
                   +N:ern X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rn  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rn  R      ;

LEXICON ESKE_LOAN
                   +N:esk X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:sk  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:sk  R      ;

LEXICON OVBE_LOAN
                   +N:ovb X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ovb R      ;

LEXICON IJDE_LOAN
                   +N:ijd X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ijd R      ;

LEXICON IJLE_LOAN
                   +N:ijl X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ijl R      ;


LEXICON EKTE_LOAN
                   +N:ekt X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:kt  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:kt  R      ;

LEXICON AKTE_LOAN
                   +N:akt X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:kt  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:kt  R      ;


LEXICON ARME_LOAN
                   +N:arm X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rm  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rm  R      ;

LEXICON ARVE_LOAN
                   +N:arv X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rv  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rv  R      ;

LEXICON ERVE_LOAN
                   +N:erv X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rv  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rv  R      ;

LEXICON ERTE_LOAN
                   +N:ert X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:rt  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:rt  R      ;


LEXICON ASJE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:sj  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
                   +N:asj X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:sje R      ;

LEXICON GRAAFE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:f  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
                   +N:af X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:f  R      ;

LEXICON JUME
           +N+Err/Orth:^umm X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:^um  X_NIEJTE ;
            +N+Use/NG:jumm X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jum  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^um  R      ;


LEXICON JÖÖRE
              +N+Err/Orth:öör   X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
              +N+Err/Orth:ör   X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
              +N+Err/Orth:jör  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
                      +N:jöör X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:ör   R      ; !SW
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:ør   R      ; !NOR

LEXICON ÖÖRE_LOAN
                      +N:öör X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:ör  R      ; !SW
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:ør  R      ; !NOR

LEXICON LÅÅGE_LOAN
                   +N:ååg X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:og  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:og  R      ;
          +N+Der/les:åågel LES ; ! NB! vej. Der/lassje Der/ladtje konversjon ?

LEXICON AALE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:l  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les ! nasjovnaale
                   +N:al X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les ! nasjovnaale
    +N+Err/Orth:l  X_NIEJTE ; ! nasjovnale
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:l  R      ;

LEXICON IJAALE_LOAN
    +N+Err/Orth:aal  X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:al   X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:jal  X_NIEJTE ;
            +N:jaal X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:al   R      ;

LEXICON IJAATE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:aat  X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:at   X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:jat  X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaat X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:at   R      ;

LEXICON IJAADE_LOAN
              +N+Err/Orth:aad  X_NIEJTE ;
              +N+Err/Orth:ad   X_NIEJTE ;
              +N+Err/Orth:jad  X_NIEJTE ;
                      +N:jaad X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:ad   R      ; !SW
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:ade  R      ; !NOR


LEXICON IJAARE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:aar  X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:ar   X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:jar  X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaar X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ar   R      ;

LEXICON IJARKE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:aark  X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:ark   X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaark X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:jark  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ark   R      ;


LEXICON AATE_LOAN
                   +N:at X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:t  X_NIEJTE ;
           +N+Err/Orth:ht X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:t  R      ;


LEXICON AARE_LOAN
                   +N:ar  X_NIEJTE ; ! januaare
  +N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:r  FINAL1 ; ! januar
           +N+Err/Orth:r  X_NIEJTE ; ! januare
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:r  R      ;

LEXICON IJLE_LOAN_N
 +N+Use/NG:ijl X_NIEJTE ;
        +N:ïjl X_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON EETE_LOAN   !!= @CODE@ loanwords with -eete -
    +N+Err/Orth:t  X_NIEJTE ; ! identitete
                   +N:et X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les identiteete
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:t  R      ;

!!€gt-norm: universiteete # Even-syllable test
!!€ universiteete:           universiteete+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ universiteetem:          universiteete+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ universiteetesne:	    universiteete+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ universiteetetje:	    universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ universiteetetjem:	    universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ universiteetetjisnie:	universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine

LEXICON IJAANE_LOAN
    +N+Err/Orth:an   X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:aan  X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:jan  X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaan X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:an   R      ;
