src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
bulevaarde+Sem/Dummytag:buleva ARDE_LOAN ;
dataskjeerme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:data#skje ERME_LOAN ;
eksterijööre+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:eksteri JÖÖRE ;
sosiolekte:sosiol EKTE_LOAN ;
emaalje+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ema ALJE_LOAN ;
entusijaasme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:entusi JASME_LOAN ;
faakse+Sem/Dummytag:fa AKSE_LOAN ;
gendaarme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:genda ARME_LOAN ;
gerundijume+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gerundi JUME ;
hasaarde+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hasa ARDE_LOAN ;
husaruniforme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:husar#uniform ISTE_LOAN ;
hydraante+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hydra ANTE_LOAN ;
industriengasjemeente+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:indu^stri#engasjeme ENTE_LOAN ;
interijööre+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:interi JÖÖRE ;
kalligraafe+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kalli^gra GRAAFE_LOAN ;
kavijaare+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kavi IJAARE_LOAN ;
kolportaasje+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kolporta ASJE_LOAN ;
konferaanse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:konfera ANSE_LOAN ;
konseerve+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:konse ERVE_LOAN ;
krokodillefaarme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:krokodille#fa ARME_LOAN ;
kultuvredokumentasjovneprosjeekte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kultuvre#dokumentasjovne#prosje EKTE_LOAN ;
kuveerte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kuve ERTE_LOAN ;
kvaaste+Sem/Dummytag:kva ASTE_LOAN ;
legeende+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:lege ENDE_LOAN ;
maalme+Sem/Dummytag:ma ALME_LOAN ;
marinarkeolååge+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:marin#arkeol LÅÅGE_LOAN ;
mastodonte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mastodont ISTE_LOAN ;
materijaale+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:materi IJAALE_LOAN ;
medaalje+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:meda ALJE_LOAN ;
modellööre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:modell ÖÖRE_LOAN ;
monegaaske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:monega ASKE_LOAN ;
moraale+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mora AALE_LOAN ;
legitimiteete+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:legitimite EETE_LOAN ;
olympijaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:olympi IJAADE_LOAN ;
optimaate+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:optima AATE_LOAN ;
oveerse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ove ERSE_LOAN ;
paragraafe+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:paara^gra GRAAFE_LOAN ;
patrijaarke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:patri IJARKE_LOAN ;
peerme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pe ERME_LOAN ;
pleonaasme+Sem/Dummytag:pleona ASME_LOAN ;
preparaante+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:prepara ANTE_LOAN ;
proletarijaate+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:proletari IJAATE_LOAN ;
prosjeekte+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:provsje EKTE_LOAN ;
provisorijume+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:provisori JUME ;
reservoaare+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:reservo^a AARE_LOAN ;
reveerse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:reve ERSE_LOAN ;
saemiedigkiepresideente+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:saemie#digkie#preside ENTE_LOAN ;
sarkaasme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sarka ASME_LOAN ;
seerbe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:se ERBE_LOAN ;
skaarve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ska ARVE_LOAN ;
stipeende+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:stipe ENDE_LOAN ;
telefaakse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:telefa AKSE_LOAN ;
traaste+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tra ASTE_LOAN ;
trikotaasje+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:trikota ASJE_LOAN ;
vaakte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:va AKTE_LOAN ;
veerbe+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ve ERBE_LOAN ;
viktorijaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:viktori IJAANE_LOAN ;
voejemebasseenge+Sem/Dummytag:voejeme#basse ENGE_LOAN ;
faageteekste+Sem/Dummytag:faage#te EKSTE_LOAN ;
aamhteseprovsateekste+Sem/Dummytag:aamhtese#provsa#te EKSTE_LOAN ;
gïelekonferaanse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gïele#konfera ANSE_LOAN ;
blinklanteerne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:blinklante ERNE_LOAN ;
kaveerne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kave ERNE_LOAN ;
burleeske+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:burle ESKE_LOAN ;
homofovbe+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:homof OVBE_LOAN ;
hydrofovbe+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hydrof OVBE_LOAN ;
baseanhydrijde+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:baseanhydr IJDE_LOAN ; 
kaliumbromijde+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kaliumbrom IJDE_LOAN ; 
klusijle+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:klus IJLE_LOAN_N ;
